Maryland, session 2025, HB0578.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – State Finance and Procurement
4–415.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0578*

HOUSE BILL 578
(a) This section does not apply to any capital expenditures by the Department of
Transportation or the Maryland Transportation Authority in connection with State roads,
bridges, or highways VALUED BELOW $500,000.
(b) Before execution, a contract for the acquisition of land shall be:
(1) reviewed by the Secretary of General Services; and
(2) except as provided in § 12–204 of this article, after that review,
approved by the Board of Public Works.
(c) (1) This subsection does not apply to any capital expenditure VALUED
BELOW $500,000 by:
(i) the Maryland Aviation Administration;
(ii) the Maryland Port Administration; or
(iii) the Maryland Transit Administration.
(2) At least 40 days before the Board of Public Works may act on a land
acquisition, the Division shall give written notice of a potential acquisition of land:
(i) to the governing body of the county in which the land is located;
and
(ii) if the land is located within a municipal corporation, to the
governing body of the municipal corporation.
(3) Within 30 days after receiving notice under this subsection, the
governing body may submit written comments to the Division.
(d) The Board of Public Works shall supervise the expenditure of any money that
the General Assembly appropriates for the acquisition of land.
10–202.
(a) This section does not apply to property to be acquired in connection with State
roads, bridges, or highways VALUED BELOW $500,000.
(b) Subject to Title 12 of the Real Property Article, the Board may condemn
property for State use.
(c) The Department of General Services, with the approval of the Board, shall
adopt regulations in accordance with Title 10, Subtitle 1 of the State Government Article
that establish a uniform method of determining the value of any applicable life estate
discount for property condemned in accordance with this section.

HOUSE BILL 578 3
12–101.
(a) This section does not apply to:
(1) capital expenditures by the Department of Transportation or the
Maryland Transportation Authority, in connection with State roads, bridges, or highways,
as provided in § 12–202 of this title, VALUED BELOW $500,000; or
(2) procurements by the Department of General Services for the purpose of
modernizing cybersecurity infrastructure for the State valued below $1,000,000.
(b) (1) The Board may control procurement by units.
(2) To implement the provisions of this Division II, the Board may:
(i) set policy;
(ii) adopt regulations, in accordance with Title 10, Subtitle 1 of the
State Government Article; and
(iii) establish internal operational procedures consistent with this
Division II.
(3) The Board shall ensure that the regulations of the primary
procurement units provide for procedures that are consistent with this Division II and Title
13, Subtitle 4 of the State Personnel and Pensions Article and, to the extent the
circumstances of a particular type of procurement or a particular unit do not require
otherwise, are substantially the same.
(4) The Board may delegate any of its authority that it determines to be
appropriate for delegation and may require prior Board approval for specified procurement
actions.
(5) Except as limited by the Maryland Constitution, the Board may
exercise any control authority conferred on a primary procurement unit by this Division II
and, to the extent that its action conflicts with the action of the primary procurement unit,
the action of the Board shall prevail.
12–103.
(a) This section does not apply to capital expenditures by the Department of
Transportation or the Maryland Transportation Authority, in connection with State roads,
bridges, or highways, as provided in § 12–202 of this title, VALUED BELOW $500,000.
(b) Notwithstanding any delegation of authority under § 12–101 of this subtitle,
the Board retains full authority to engage in procurement of services and supplies for itself.

HOUSE BILL 578
(c) By resolution, the Board may authorize a Board member or a unit to exercise
all or any part of the authority of the Board for a specific Board procurement or for a
particular class of Board procurements.
12–107.
(a) This section does not apply to capital expenditures by the Department of
Transportation or the Maryland Transportation Authority, in connection with State roads,
bridges, or highways, as provided in § 12–202 of this title, VALUED BELOW $500,000.
(b) Subject to the authority of the Board, jurisdiction over procurement is as
follows:
(3) the Department of Transportation and the Maryland Transportation
Authority, without the approval of any of the other primary procurement units, may engage
in the procurement of:
(i) construction that is related to transportation, as provided in the
Transportation Article;
(ii) construction related services that are related to transportation,
as provided in the Transportation Article;
(iii) architectural or engineering services that are related to
transportation, under Title 13, Subtitle 3 of this article;
(iv) rolling stock and other property peculiar to the operation of a
transit system, as provided in § 7–403 of the Transportation Article;
(v) supplies for aeronautics related activities, including motor
vehicles and information processing supplies, but excluding:
1. supplies funded by the proceeds from State general
obligation bonds; and
2. insurance; and
(vi) services for aeronautics related activities, including information
processing services, but excluding banking and financial services under the authority of the
State Treasurer under item (1) of this subsection;
12–108.
(a) This section does not apply to capital expenditures by the Department of
Transportation or the Maryland Transportation Authority, in connection with State roads,
bridges, or highways, as provided in § 12–202 of this title, VALUED BELOW $500,000.

HOUSE BILL 578 5
(b) Subject to the approval of the Board and under the coordination of the
Governor, each of the primary procurement units shall:
(1) adopt regulations to carry out this Division II;
(2) send to the Board a copy of each proposed regulation under item (1) of
this subsection; and
(3) send to the Board a copy of each internal operating procedure that the
primary procurement unit adopts.
12–202.
(a) This section does not apply to capital expenditures:
(1) for public school construction under Title 5, Subtitle 3 of the Education
Article; or
(2) by the Department of Transportation or the Maryland Transportation
Authority, in connection with State roads, bridges, or highways VALUED BELOW
$500,000.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.